dictsource/fa_rules
	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ی
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) ی (L03_	je
		//فعایل eg. شرایط
			_L04L04ا) ی (L03_	je
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) ی (L03_	je
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب
			_م) ی (L04وL03_	j
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) ی (L04وL03_	jo
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
		_م) ی (L04L03_	j
			//_مL04) ی (L03_	ja
		//افعال eg. اخلاق
			//_ا) ی (L04اL03_	j
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) ی (L04ّL03_	ja
			_مL04) ی (ّL03_	ja
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم
			_ت) ی (L04یL03_	j
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) ی (L03_+	i
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) ی (L03_	jo
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) ی (L03L03_+	ja
			_تL04) ی (L03_++	jjo
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) ی (L03ّL03_+	ja
			_تL04) ی (ّL03_	jjo
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) ی (L03_	je
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) ی (L04اL03_	je
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) ی (L04L03_+	j
			_مستL04) ی (L03_	je
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) ی (L03_	je
			_متL04اL03) ی (_	i
			_متL04او) ی (_	i
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) ی (L04L03_++	ja
			_متL04) ی (L03_	jje
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) ی (L04ّL03_++	ja
			_متL04) ی (ّL03_	jje
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) ی (تL04L03_+	j
			_مL04ت) ی (L03_	je
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) ی (L03L03_++	ja
			_من) ی (یL03_+	ja
			_منL04) ی (L03_	je
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)

// Arabic characters


.group ء
	ء	?
	// suffixes ء
		L09L09L04) ء (_Sm1	?
		L09L09ا) ء (_Sm1	
		L09L09آ) ء (_Sm1	


//this character "ٔ" is defrent of "ء" and "ۀ" for example "دانشنامهٔ "


.group ٴ
	L04) ٴ	
	ا) ٴ	a?
	ٴ	

	// suffixes ٴ
		L09L03) ٴ (_NSm1	je


.group ّ
	L02) ّ	taSdid


.group ئ
	ئی	i:
	ئ (L01	?
	ئ (L02	?
	L02) ئ	?
	ئ (L03	?e

	// Suffixes "ئ"
		L09L01) ئ (_NSm1	je
		L09L03) ئ (_NSm1	i
		L09L01) ئ (_Sm1	?
		L09L03) ئ (_Sm1	a?
		L09L01) ئئ (_Sm2	i:
		L09L03) ئئ (_Sm2	ii
		L09L01) ئی (_Sm2	i:
		L09L03) ئی (_Sm2	ii
		L09L09) ئیه (_NSm3	i:je
		L09L09) ئیۀ (_NSm3	i:jeje
		L09L03) ئه (_+NSm2	ije
		L09L01) ئه (_+NSm2	je
		L09L03) ئۀ (_+NSm2	ijeje
		L09L01) ئۀ (_+NSm2	jeje


.group ؤ
	ؤ	o?


.group ة
	//ة (L01	h
	ة	t


.group ٰ
	ٰ	A


.group ٓ
	ٓ	


//short vowels that are not usually written:

.group َ
	َ	a
	_ا) َ	'a:
	// Suffixes "َ"
		L09L09) َ (_Sm1	a


.group ِ
	ِ	e
	_ا) ِ	'e:
	// Suffixes "ِ"
		L09L09) ِ (_Sm1	e


.group ُ
	ُ	o
	_ا) ُ	'o:
	// Suffixes "ُ"
		L09L09) ُ (_Sm1	o


.group ْ
	ْ	
	// Suffixes "ْ"
		L09L09) ْ (_Sm1	


.group ً
	ً	an
	// Suffixes "ً"
		L09L04) ً (_Sm1	an


.group ٍ
	ٍ	en
	// Suffixes "ٍ"
		L09L04) ٍ (_Sm1	en


.group ٌ
	ٌ	on
// Suffixes "ٌ"
		L09L04) ٌ (_Sm1	on


//other characters


.group أ
	أ	a?
	أ (َ	


.group إ
	إ	e?
	إ (ِ	


.group ـ
	ـ	


.group ،


.group ؛
	؛	

// default group (required to compile correctly)

.group
        '



// rules for Farsi written by English characters (Pinglish)
// Sometimes, Farsi speakers write Farsi words using English characters, particularly in Chat and SMS (texte messages).), called Pinglish


.group a
	a	_^_en
	?1 a	a
	?1 a ('	A


.group aa
	aa	_^_en
	?1 aa	A


.group b
	b	_^_en
    ?1 b	b


.group c
	c	_^_en
	?1 c (e	s
	?1 c (y	s
	?1 c (i	s
	?1 c	k


.group ch
	ch	_^_en
	?1 ch	tS


.group d
	d	_^_en
	?1 d	d


.group e
	e	_^_en
	?1 e	e


.group ee
	ee	_^_en
	?1 ee	i


.group f
	f	_^_en
	?1 f	f


.group g
	g	_^_en
	?1 g	g


.group gh
	gh	_^_en
	?1 gh	q1


.group h
	h	_^_en
	?1 h	h


.group i
	i	_^_en
	?1 i	i


.group j
	j	_^_en
	?1 j	dZ


.group jh
	jh	_^_en
	?1 jh	Z


.group k
	k	_^_en
	?1 k	k


.group kh
	kh	_^_en
	?1 kh	x


.group l
	l	_^_en
	?1 l	l


.group m
	m	_^_en
	?1 m	m


.group n
	n	_^_en
	?1 n	n


.group o
	o	_^_en
	?1 o	o


.group ou
	ou	_^_en
	?1 ou	u


.group oo
	oo	_^_en
	?1 oo	u
	?1 oo (o	


.group p
	p	_^_en
	?1 p	p


.group ph
	ph	_^_en
	


.group q
	q	_^_en
	?1 q	q1


.group r
	r	_^_en
	?1 r	R


.group s
	s	_^_en
	?1 s	s


.group sh
	sh	_^_en
	?1 sh	S


.group t
	t	_^_en
	?1 t	t


.group th
	th	_^_en
	


.group u
	u	_^_en
	?1 u	u


.group v
	v	_^_en
	?1 v	v


.group w
	w	_^_en
	?1 w	w


.group x
	x	_^_en
	?1 x	ks


.group y
	y	_^_en
	?1 y	j


.group z
	z	_^_en
	?1 z	z


// Others mathematics characters
.group
	. (D     	noq1te:
	±	m'osbat||jA:||m'anfi
	>=	boz'oRgtaR||jA:||m,osAvi
	<=	kutS'ektaR||jA:||m,osAvi
	
